Wisconsin, session 2025, AB427.
do enact as follows:AB427,11Section 1. 175.60 (2g) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB427,2,42175.60 (2g) (a) A licensee or an out-of-state licensee may carry a concealed 3weapon anywhere in this state except as provided under subs. (15m) and (16) and 4ss. 941.236, 943.13 (1m) (c), and 948.605 (2) (b) 1r.AB427,25Section 2. 175.60 (5) (a) 6. of the statutes is amended to read:AB427,2,116175.60 (5) (a) 6. A statement of the places under sub. (16) where a licensee is 7prohibited from carrying a weapon, as well as an explanation of the provisions 8under sub. (15m) and ss. 941.236, 943.13 (1m) (c), and 948.605 (2) (b) 1r. that could 9limit the places where the licensee may carry a weapon, with a place for the 10applicant to sign his or her name to indicate that he or she has read and 11understands the statement.AB427,312Section 3. 938.34 (14q) of the statutes is amended to read:AB427,3,713938.34 (14q) Certain bomb scares and firearm violations. In addition to 14any other disposition imposed under this section, if the juvenile is found to have 15violated s. 947.015 and the property involved is owned or leased by the state or any 16political subdivision of the state, or if the property involved is a school premises, as 1defined in s. 948.61 (1) (c), or if the juvenile is found to have violated s. 941.235, 2941.236, or 948.605, immediately suspend the juvenile’s operating privilege, as 3defined in s. 340.01 (40), for 2 years. The court shall immediately forward to the 4department of transportation the notice of suspension, stating that the suspension 5is for a violation of s. 947.015 involving school premises, or for a violation of s. 6941.235, 941.236, or 948.605. If otherwise eligible, the juvenile is eligible for an 7occupational license under s. 343.10.AB427,48Section 4. 938.78 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB427,4,89938.78 (3) Release of information when escape or absence; rules. If a 10juvenile adjudged delinquent under s. 48.12, 1993 stats., or s. 938.12 or found to be 11in need of protection or services under s. 48.13 (12) or (14), 1993 stats., or s. 938.13 12(12) or (14) on the basis of a violation of s. 943.23 (1m) or (1r), 1999 stats., or s. 13943.23 (1g), 2021 stats., or s. 941.10, 941.11, 941.20, 941.21, 941.23, 941.231, 14941.235, 941.236, 941.237, 941.26, 941.28, 941.295, 941.298, 941.30, 941.31, 15941.32, 941.325, 943.02, 943.03, 943.04, 943.10 (2) (a), 943.231 (1), 943.32 (2), 16948.02, 948.025, 948.03, 948.05, 948.055, 948.085 (2), 948.60, 948.605, or 948.61 or 17any crime specified in ch. 940 has escaped from a juvenile correctional facility, 18residential care center for children and youth, secured residential care center for 19children and youth, inpatient facility, as defined in s. 51.01 (10), juvenile detention 20facility, or juvenile portion of a county jail, or from the custody of a peace officer or 21a guard of such a facility, center, or jail, or has been allowed to leave a juvenile 22correctional facility, residential care center for children and youth, secured 23residential care center for children and youth, inpatient facility, juvenile detention 1facility, or juvenile portion of a county jail for a specified time period and is absent 2from the facility, center, home, or jail for more than 12 hours after the expiration of 3the specified period, the department of corrections or county department, 4whichever has supervision over the juvenile, may release the juvenile’s name and 5any information about the juvenile that is necessary for the protection of the public 6or to secure the juvenile’s return to the facility, center, home, or jail. The 7department of corrections shall promulgate rules establishing guidelines for the 8release of the juvenile’s name or information about the juvenile to the public.AB427,59Section 5. 939.632 (1) (e) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:AB427,4,1110939.632 (1) (e) 3. Any misdemeanor under s. 940.19 (1), 940.225 (3m), 940.32 11(2), 940.42, 940.44, 941.20 (1), 941.23, 941.231, 941.235, 941.236, or 941.38 (3).AB427,612Section 6. 941.235 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB427,4,1613941.235 (1) Any person who goes armed with a firearm in any building owned 14or leased by the state or any political subdivision of the state is guilty of a Class A 15misdemeanor. This subsection does not apply to a building on the grounds of a 16university or college.AB427,717Section 7. 941.236 of the statutes is created to read:AB427,4,2018941.236 Possessing a firearm at a university or college. (1) Any person 19who possesses a firearm is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor if any of the following 20applies:AB427,4,2221(a) The person is in a privately or publicly owned building on the grounds of a 22university or college.AB427,5,21(b) The person is on the grounds of or land owned or occupied by a university 2or college.AB427,5,43(2) Subsection (1) does not apply to the possession of a firearm by any of the 4following:AB427,5,65(a) A person who is employed in this state by a public agency as a law 6enforcement officer and to whom s. 941.23 (1) (g) 2. to 5. and (2) (b) 1. to 3. applies.AB427,5,77(b) Armed forces or military personnel going armed in the line of duty.AB427,5,108(c) A person who leases residential premises that are not a dormitory or part 9of a residence hall, or who leases business premises on the grounds of the university 10or college, if the person is in or on the premises.AB427,5,1111(d) A person for use in a program approved by the university or college.AB427,5,1312(e) A person in accordance with a contract entered into between the university 13or college and the person or an employer of the person.AB427,5,1514(f) A person who possesses a firearm that is not loaded and is any of the 15following:AB427,5,16161. Encased, as defined in s. 167.31 (1) (b).AB427,5,17172. In a locked firearms rack that is on a motor vehicle.AB427,818Section 8. 943.13 (1m) (c) 4. of the statutes is amended to read:AB427,6,519943.13 (1m) (c) 4. While carrying a firearm, enters or remains in any part of 20a building that is owned, occupied, or controlled by the state or any local 21governmental unit, excluding any building or portion of a building under s. 175.60 22(16) (a), if the state or local governmental unit has notified the actor not to enter or 23remain in the building while carrying a firearm or with that type of firearm. This 1subdivision does not apply to any building or portion of a building under s. 175.60 2(16) (a) or a privately or publicly owned building on the grounds of a university or 3college, to a person who leases residential or business premises in the building, or, 4if the firearm is in a vehicle driven or parked in the parking facility, to any part of 5the building used as a parking facility.AB427,96Section 9. 943.13 (1m) (c) 5. of the statutes is repealed.AB427,107Section 10. 943.13 (2) (bm) 2. am. of the statutes is amended to read:AB427,6,158943.13 (2) (bm) 2. am. For the purposes of sub. (1m) (c) 2., and 4., and 5., an 9owner or occupant of a part of a nonresidential building, or the state or a local 10governmental unit, or a university or a college has notified an individual not to 11enter or remain in a part of the building while carrying a firearm or with a 12particular type of firearm if the owner, occupant, state, or local governmental unit, 13university, or college has posted a sign that is located in a prominent place near all 14of the entrances to the part of the building to which the restriction applies and any 15individual entering the building can be reasonably expected to see the sign.AB427,1116Section 11. 968.255 (1) (a) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB427,6,1817968.255 (1) (a) 2. A person arrested for any misdemeanor under s. 167.30 (1), 18940.19, 941.20 (1), 941.23, 941.231, 941.236, 941.237, 948.60, or 948.61.AB427,1219Section 12. 973.137 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB427,6,2020973.137 (1) A violation of s. 941.235 or 941.236.AB427,6,2121